ipjsua/Classes/View Contollers/Applications/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015.app/Contents/Required/Linguistics/Providers/Plugins2/AdobeHunspellPlugin.bundle/Contents/SharedSupport/Dictionaries/en_GB/hyph_en_GB.dic
UTF-8
% ADOBE CONFIDENTIAL
% ___________________
%
%  Copyright ©2011 Adobe Systems Incorporated
%  All Rights Reserved.
%
% NOTICE:  All information contained herein is, and remains
% the property of Adobe Systems Incorporated and its suppliers,
% if any.  The intellectual and technical concepts contained
% herein are proprietary to Adobe Systems Incorporated and its
% suppliers and are protected by trade secret or copyright law.
% Dissemination of this information or reproduction of this material
% is strictly forbidden unless prior written permission is obtained
% from Adobe Systems Incorporated.
%
% Version 1.0.1
%
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDLEFTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDRIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
NOHYPHEN -,',’
1-1
1'1
1’1
1's./'=s,1,2
1't./'=t,1,2
1’s./’=s,1,2
1’t./’=t,1,2
NEXTLEVEL
.a2
.ar3a1bl2
.a2r1d
.a2r1s
.ar1ie
.ar4t3i2s2t.
.ar1tis
.ar4t3i2s2ts
.art3in
.artic3u
.ar1tic
.art3ie
.ar1te
.ar1l
.ar1g
.ar3mis2
.ar3mie
.ar1my
.ar1q
.ad2d3in
.ad1d2
.ad2d3ed
.ad1l
.av1a1r
.av3i2d.
.avi2t
.av3e2r.
.aveng3er
.as1s
.as1ta
.as1te
.as1p
.aus1
.aun2
.aunt3i
.au2nt
.au1ge
.an1ad
.anal3y3ses
.an3do
.an1de
.an1kl
.a2nk
.an2op
.an1c
.an3is2e.
.ani1o
.an1il
.an3t2e.
.a2nt
.an3t2ed
.an3tes
.ant1l
.an1g
.ab1al2
.absor3be2nt
.a2bs2
.ab1so
.absor2b
.ab2u
.ab1er
.ac3ron
.a4ch
.ach2e
.ac1on
.accept3an
.a2c1c2
.ac3ce
.ac1cep
.acce2pt
.ace3t2i
.act1a
.a2ct
.ac3ti
.air1i
.ais2
.ai1la
.ae1d
.af1f
.affor4es3ta
.affor1e
.affor3est4
.af1f2o
.af1t
.a4fl
.ath3e2ns
.at1ol
.a1to
.atom3
.at3o2m.
.at3o2ms
.a2t1op
.at1e
.al1d
.al2dr2
.al3u2m.
.al1oe
.al1op
.al2is
.al1i
.al3ip
.al1t
.al1le
.ag1at
.ag3n2
.ag2l
.am1ar
.am1at
.am1o3ro
.am1it
.am1et
.ammo1
.a2m1m2
.am1p
.az1u
.ap3rop
.a4ph
.aph3o1
.apo3li
.apt1e
.a2pt
.ap1pre1ci3
.ap1p2
.appre1c
.r2
.ra3ve2n.
.rav3en3o2
.rav3eni
.rav3ene
.rav3el
.ras1t
.rand3i
.ran3kli
.ra2nk
.r2a1ni
.ra1ch
.ra2c3is
.r2aci
.ra2cie
.rag3g
.raw1l
.3ra3phe
.rap3is2
.rug3g
.rov3er
.ro1sc
.ros3in
.ros3ie
.ros3es
.ros1t
.ron1
.ro3bl2
.rois3
.rol4l3in2
.rol1li
.roll3er
.3rog3a1to
.row1d
.rop1i
.ro2q
.ri1va
.r2iv
.ring3er
.r2inge
.ril1i
.re3a2d1m
.rere4
.rer2
.re1rec3
.re1du
.2red
.r2e1sh
.resist3a
.re1sis
.res3erva
.re3stat
.r4esta
.re1us
.re1na
.r2e1ni
.re2n2t3
.re3cor
.rec3og
.rector3a
.re2ct
.rec1to
.re2i2n.
.re1in
.rei2n3t
.re1es
.re3ta
.re1te
.re2l3ic
.re1li
.re3mis
.re1w
.re1pi
.d2
.dart3e
.1dart
.da3ise
.1dai
.du1ra
.1dur
.du1re
.du2c
.dul2l
.do3ris
.dia3r4i2
.di1ar
.dia3ry
.div4e
.1div
.di3ves
.dis1t
.dic3es
.di3er
.de1r1a
.de3r1is
.1de3sc
.des2ce
.dec3a3go2n.
.1dec
.de2cag
.de1ca
.def4i
.1def
.de2gra3da
.de1g
.1de3moc
.dem3oi
.dwin1
.d1wi
.var3ies
.var3y1i
.val1a
.va3lis
.val1i
.vagi1
.va1p
.1vo1li
.1vi3d2e.
.vid3eo
.ve1r1a
.vend3er
.ven3ue
.ve3nou
.veno2
.k2
.kro3
.k2o1s
.kes3
.s2
.sa1ti3a
.1sat
.sala3bi
.sal1a2b
.salt3e
.sk2
.sh2
.shov3er
.sh1in3g2
.sorb3en
.sor2b
.so4lu
.sol3ute
.so1lut
.soph3i2s2t.
.sophi2s
.soph3i2s2ts
.scal3i
.s1ca
.sci1o
.s4ce
.1sis1
.sin3g2l
.2s1ing
.si2b
.s4it
.si3gn2o
.signo3r2i.
.1se3r2a.
.ser1a
.serv3an
.se3rie
.sev3er1a
.1sev
.sev3er1in
.sever3i
.sev3e2red
.ses1
.sen1a
.se2b
.sell3i
.sell3e
.stran4g3er
.strang4
.st4i
.st4e
.ste3roida
.slan3d
.2slan
.sy2
.symme3trie
.sy2m1m2
.sym1metri
.spi3ran
.spell3i
.spel4
.h2
.har3pie
.ha1de
.ha3ve2r.
.ha3v3e2n.
.hand3i
.han3dler
.ha2g
.hus1s
.hu1me
.hor1a
.hov1
.hos3es
.hon3ey
.ho3lis
.ho3lie2
.hi3a
.hi1b
.hil2
.hi1la
.hill3i
.he3re2s.
.hes1
.heu1
.hen1d
.he2c
.he2i
.he1is2
.het1
.hem3i3s2
.hys1
.u2
.u2r1s
.urop1
.ur1c
.u4ri
.us1a
.ush1
.un1
.und2
.un2i3f
.unte4
.u2nt
.un3g
.ul1
.ug1l
.up1
.o2
.o4ra
.or3an
.or3a1to
.o2r1d
.orbit3a
.or1b
.or1c
.or1if
.or1t
.od2d3
.odd1e
.o1d1on
.ov2er
.ov1en
.os1c
.osi3
.os1t
.os2t1l
.osmo3s
.os1m
.out1
.oo1d
.oo1l
.oo1g
.ooz1i
.oo1ph
.on1o
.obser3van
.o2bs2
.ob1se
.obes2
.o1b1el
.oblig3ator
.o1bl2
.ob3l4i1ga
.obl2ig
.obli4ga1to
.o1c1a1
.och2e
.oi2
.oeu2
.oth1
.old1
.ol1i
.om1in
.oys1
.ox3
.ox2ya1
.n2
.2nar1e
.na1d
.na1k
.1na2na
.na1c
.na1te
.na1l
.na1po
.na3per
.nucle3a
.nu1cl
.nos1i
.nos3es
.nota3ry
.no1ta
.no1tar
.no3t1ic
.no1l
.no2m4o1l
.no1mo
.no3me
.ni2c
.ni1ca1
.ne2ar
.nea3po
.ne1ap
.neth1
.nel1
.b2
.bar3it
.bani2
.ba2n3ia
.bur3ia
.budg3e2ts
.bud2ge
.bus3ses
.buss2
.bust3e
.bun3k1er
.bunk2e
.bu2nk
.but2t3i
.b2ut1t2
.but4t3ed
.bo3a2s.
.bos1o
.1bos
.bi1va
.1biv
.bi1cu
.be1r2a
.bel4l3in2
.1bel
.3bell
.bel1li
.b1less3
.1bl2
.c2
.car3at
.1ca
.car3ol
.car3ie
.ca3nas
.ca2nt4
.can3ter
.ca2t1i1
.calo3rie
.cal1ori
.ca3per
.cra3ter
.1cre3ti
.ch2
.ch4i
.chill3in2
.che3d2e
.2ched
.chem3ist
.cur2vi
.cur1v
.cur2vy1
.cuss1
.cor3nea
.cor3ner
.coun3te2r.
.cou2nt
.coun3te2rs
.coun3tes
.conveni3e
.1con1v
.conve2
.conven1i
.co1i1t
.1coi
.col4our3e2d.
.col1our
.colou2red
.co3lit
.cogniz4
.cog1n
.c4ogni3za
.1cop3ie
.ci1d
.1cis1
.c2in1d
.ci2c
.cit1r
.ci2t1i
.c1i2ty
.ce2n1s2
.ce1t
.cel1a
.cle4
.1cl
.cle2m1
.cyst3ic
.1cy
.i2
.ir3r
.ir4it
.ivo1
.is2i
.io1d2
.in1
.inam1
.ind4i4c3a1tiv
.2ind
.indi1ca
.i2n2k
.in1k3l
.ino1s
.i4ni
.ic1es
.if3
.it2i
.il1
.ill4
.ig1
.im1
.i2m3b
.imi1
.i2m3m2
.immuno3a
.im1mun
.immu1no
.ip1
.e2
.ear3li
.ea1d
.eas1i
.ea1g
.er2a
.er2r1i
.er1r
.er2og
.er3n
.1ed3ith1
.ed3it1in
.ed3ite
.evil3l4
.evi2l
.ev3e2r.
.ev3ere
.ek1i
.es1
.eso1
.espe1
.eu1
.eo1
.enam1
.en1c
.e2n1t
.en3ta
.en1g2i
.e1b1o
.e2b2b
.ebb1i
.e2c1t
.ei1d
.ei1s
.ei1t
.ei1l
.ee1r2
.e4th
.el3der
.el3ver
.e2lv
.e1l1io
.el3ig
.electa4
.ele2ct
.elect3a1bl2
.el1e1m
.el1e3p
.el2f
.eg1l
.eg2g
.egg1i
.ew1
.eq3uit
.equ2
.fam3i1ly
.1fa
.fri2c1
.1fr
.fu1t
.1fu
.forgiva3
.1f2o
.for1giv
.for2m3a1tiv
.for1ma
.form4e
.for3m3e2r.
.fes3
.fen4e
.fe2n
.fe2b
.fell3er
.flu3o3roc
.1fl
.t2
.1ta2r1d
.tav1
.tast3er
.taf1
.ta1te
.tal2e
.ta3ler
.tall3e
.tam3pe
.tra4ve
.trol4l3in2
.trol1li
.troll3er
.tro3pis2m.
.2tropis
.tric3es
.1t4r2ice
.tri3p4lin
.trip3li
.tr2ipl
.trea3tie
.trea3ty
.th2
.tho2m
.1tu1r2i
.tu1te
.1tut
.tu1me
.to1ri
.to3rer2
.to1no
.to3nie
.to1ny
.tol2l
.tol1l3i
.t2i1ni
.tin3g2l
.ti1ny
.ti2e
.ti2t1i
.til1i
.til2l
.ti2m
.ter1na3
.te3red2
.t2ere
.ten3an
.ten3d2e
.1tend
.ten1o
.te4f
.te2l
.tell3in2
.ty1l
.1ty
.l2
.la3re
.la2v
.la3ve2r.
.la3ve2rs
.las3si
.last3e
.la2ni
.la2c1i
.la4ti
.la3t3i2n.
.lat1in
.la1ge2
.la4me
.lun3k2e
.lu2nk
.lu3t2e.
.lute3al
.lu1tea
.lo1ra
.lor2i
.l2o3ric
.lov3er
.lo1cu
.loi1t
.l1o4gis
.li1a
.li1r
.lis2ti
.lis3tee
.liste2
.li1o
.lin1a
.li1no
.lint3er
.li2nt
.l2in3ge
.l1i2ta
.li1tc
.li2ly
.lim3ey1
.liz1
.li1p2i
.liq1
.le3vis
.le3ve2r.
.lev3er3i
.lev3ere
.lest1
.lend3e
.le2b1
.le1l
.le4gat
.le1ga
.le1g3ate
.leg1r
.leg3g
.1lem1o2
.le2p1
.l1la1
.ly1d1
.lydi3a2n
.lydi2
.ly2dia
.ly1si
.ly1se
.ly2m
.g2
.ga2r1d
.ga2to
.gam1i
.ga2my
.g4ra
.go2rie
.go2ry
.1go1p
.1gi3a
.gi2b
.ge3ran
.ger1a
.ge3nia2l.
.ge2ni4a
.geni1al
.ge2nt2
.gen3tl
.marin2
.mar3i3n1er
.ma3rie
.mar3ti
.mar3te
.1man1d
.ma2n1t
.man3g3es
.mang4
.ma2ny
.matu4r3iti
.ma1turi
.matu3r2it
.mat3i
.malay3an
.ma1lay
.mu1ri
.1mur
.mor3at
.mor3a2l.
.mo3re2s.
.mo4di
.1mod
.1mo1se
.mous3i
.moul2
.mould3e
.mo2n3ie
.1moni
.moth3
.mi3s4e2r.
.mi3se2rs
.mis3ter
.mi2n3a1b
.mi1na
.min3ut1ed
.mi3n4i.
.min3i2s.
.min1g
.miz1
.mer1c2u3
.1me3rid
.med3i2c.
.1medi
.mel1a
.me1li3o
.mye1l
.my1e
.y2
.yon1
.ye1r
.w2
.war3den
.wa2rd
.wi2
.wild3e2r.
.well3in2g.
.wellin2
.ju1r
.1j
.jor1
.z2
.za3gge
.zag1g
.zu1r
.ze1r
.ze1n
.p2
.par3a1bl2
.pas3s4er
.1pass
.pan1d
.pat3riot1is
.1patr
.patri1o
.patri1ot
.pa3triot1ic
.pal3a3t2ine
.1pala
.palat1in
.pal3li
.pray2
.pros3i
.1pros
.pro3ce
.prom3isi
.prom2i
.prom3ise
.proph3y1lax1
.pro4phyla
.pro1phy
.pre2d3a1to
.p2red
.pre1dat
.pre4s3en2t.
.pre1se2nt
.pres3entat
.presen4ta
.ph2
.phar3ynge1a
.pharyn1g
.pharyng4e
.pur2r
.purr3i
.put4te
.p2ut1t2
.putt3er1i
.putt3ere
.put4t3ed
.po1ro
.por3tag
.por1ta
.port4e
.por3t3er
.pov1
.pok1i
.pon3de
.po1g
.pi1ra
.pi3sce
.pis1c
.pi2er2
.pi2t
.pit1i
.1pi1la
.pip3er
.pe3rio2d.
.p2eri1o
.pe3r1im
.pe3res
.perfor3man
.per1f2o
.perfor1ma
.ped3a2l.
.2ped
.3peda
.ped3al1i
.ped3ale
.3pe2di
.pen3d
.pend2e
.pec1to3
.pe2ct
.pet3al
.1pet
.pe1ti
.pe3te
.que3ri
.qu2
.que3ry
.x2
.xy1
2a.
aar1o
aas1
aa1i
aa1g
ara1r
ar1a2d.
ar1a2ds
a3rad1in
a1rade
ar1a1v2
ar1ak
ar1as
a1rah
ar1ano
ar2a1ni
ar3ante
ara2nt
a1ran2g
ar1a2bs2
ar1a1be
a1ra1c2a
ar1acu
ar1a1co
ar1ace
ar1a2ct
ar1ae
ar1aff
ar1atr
ar1a2ts
ar1ath
ara3thi
a4ra1to
ar3ato1ry
4a4r3a1tiv
ara3tis
a3ra1tio
a1r2ate
ar3ald
ar1alo
a1rale
ar1all
ar1aga
ar1a1gr
ar3agl
ar1a1m
a1ra2mb
a3r2a2m1e1te
ar1awa
a1ra1j
a4ra1p
ar1a2ps
ar1aph
ar1ape
ar1apl
a1ra1q
arro1g
ar1r
ard3a2nt
a2rd
ard1ic
ar1die
ar1dit
ar2d1er
ard1l
ar1va
arv1er
ar1kle
ar1ky
ars1n
a2rs
ar1s2c
ar2s1in
ar1sie
ar1sto
ar2sw2
ar1h
ar1u2m.
a1r2o.
a1ro1r
ar1od
a4r3ousel
arou2se
a1roo
ar1o2ns
ar1o1no
aro3nis
ar1o2n1e
ar1o1ny
ar1ob
a1ro1c
ar1oi
ar1oe
ar1o2t.
ar1o2ls
ar3oli
ar3ol1li
arol3ler
ar1oly
ar1og
ar1o2m.
ar3omati
aro1ma
ar1o2ms
a1rom3i
ar3o1metri
a3rom1e1try
a3rom1e1te
1a1rop
a1ro2q
ar1ox1
ar1no
ar1nis
arn3e2r.
ar1nel1
arbi1t
ar1b
arbit2e
ar3bl2
ar2ch3an
ar1cha
3ar1chi2s
ar1chy
arco1m
ar1co
arc2i3t
ar1ci
arc3e2r.
arc3es
ar1ia
a3riasi
ar2i1as
arianc2
ari1an
ar1i2d.
ar1i2d1n
ar1idl
1arisk
ar3i2s2h.
a3rishi
ari1so
ari2s1i
ari1si3a
ar3ismat
aris1ma
ar1i1u
ar1i1o
ari1na
ar3inat
1ar2ind
a1ri2ns
a1r2ino
ar1ing
ar1ib
ari1ba
ar1i1ca
ar1i1co
a1rici
ar3icel
ar2ice
ar2ied
a1ri1et
ar1if
ar1i1ta
ar1i1to
ar3i1tie
ar1i2l.
a1rile
a1rill
ar1igo
a1rim
a1ri1w
ar1i1zo
ar3ix1
ar1e2a.
ar1eas
ar1ean
are3a2ns
a1r1e1al
ar1e1aw
ar1er2
ar4e1ro
ar1e2d1n
a2red
a1ress
a1resi
a1re1se
ar1est
1a1resq
areu1
ar1eou
are1o
are1na
a1re2ns
a3rench
ar3en2t.
are2nt
ar3en2ts
ar3enti
ar3enter
are1c
a1rei
a1ree
ar1e1fi
ar1e1fy
ar1e2l.
ar1e2ls
ar1eg
ar1e2m.
ar1e2ms
ar1ey
are1w
arf3in
ar2fe
ar2t1ag
ar1ta
ar1t2hr
art2h3ie
arth3il
art3i2e.
1ar1tee
ar1tli
ar2gee
1ar1gy
2ar1mo
armo3nis
ar1moni
armo3niz
armis2
armi2n
armi1n3a
arm3er
ar1ya
ar1ys
ar1y1o
a1ry1b
ar1yt
ar1y2l.
ar1yla
1a1ry1m
arp1e2r
arp1es
arp3ene
ar1py1
ar1qui
arqu2
a1dar
a1dav1
a1dah
a1d1ac
ad1a2l.
ad1aga
ad1am
1a1day
ad1aw
1adap
ad1ra
adr2
ad2ras
ad1ru
adru3p
a1dro3ne
a1drid
ad1r2y.
ad2d3a
ad1d2
ad1si
a2ds
ad1sw2
ad1u1a
a1duc
ad1u1la
ad1um
2a1d2o.
2a1dos
ad1osp
a2d1of2
3ad1o1t
ad1o1l
ad1o1ma
ad1ow
1adop
1a1dox1
ad1i1a1b
a2d1iv
1a1disa
ad1is1o
1a1di2si
1a1di2se
ad3i2s2t.
ad3i2s2ts
a3dis1ti
a1di1u
a1di1o
adi1o4m
ad1in
ad3i1na
ad3ing
ad3i2c.
ad1i1ca
adic1u
adi1ce
a1d2it
1a1dig
ad1ip
ad1er
a1d2e1ri
a1d1esc
ad1e1no
ad1e2n1n
ad1eni
ad1en1l
a1dei
ad1eer
ad1ela
ad1e1mo
3a1dem1ia
ad3e1mis
3a3dem3i2c.
3a3dem1i3ca
3a3dem3i2cs
3a3dem1i1cis
1a1de1me
ad1e1my
ad2ling
adle1r
1admit
a2d1m
ad1y1i
ad1w
1ad1j
a1vad
av1ah
a1van
av1ata
a1vat
av1al
av2a2l.
ava1la
av1ag
avo2r
av1oc
a2vi1ar
aviar3i
av1ida
av1idl
av1ish
av1in
av1ic
a1vic1u
av1i1to
av1iti
av1ig
av1er1a
avers3al
ave2rs
aver1sa
av3ers1es
av1er2n
av3erie
aver3i
av3e2s2t.
av4e3sto
av3esti
av1en1d
av1e1nu
a1ve2n1n
ak1a1w
ak1ro
ak2ke
ak1k2
ak1u2ps
ak1n
a1k2i.
a1kia
a1kir
ak1in
ak1it
ak1il
ak1ev
ak1est
ak1en
a1ket
ak1l
as1a1d
as1a2nt
as1a3bl2
a2sab
as1a1f
1asate
a1sat
as1ket
as1sis2
as1sib
asse3rie
as1seri
ass2ed
ash1ab
ash1ay
ash1o1v
ash1ou
as1hol
ash1in
as2h1ie
ash1er
2asu
as1u3a2ls2
as3u1a2l1n
as3u3al2l
as1ur
asur1a
asur1i
as1u3b2
a1sui
as1oa
aso1r
as1ore
a2s1ov
a1sos1
as1oh2
a1son
aso1li
as1om
aso1p
as1o1pr
as1no
as1c
as2ch2
as3c2u
as3ces
ascend3e
a1si2n.
a1si2ns
a1sino
as1i1n1i
a1sib
a1sic
a1s1if2
a1sit
asi2ti
4asitis
as1i2l.
aser1i
as1es
a1sec
a1se2ls
ase1li
asel3li
ase1m
a2s4t.
as1tar
as1taf
ast1al
ast1ag
as1tr
3a3st4rophi
a2s4ts
as1tu
as1to
asto3le
ast4o1m
as1tic
ast3ie
as1t2it
as3till
as3tig
aster3o
as2tern
as1ten
as3tell
as1tem
ast1li
as1tle
as2ly1
as1ma
as1mu
as1mo
as1mi
as1me
as1w2
as1ph2
aspir3an
aspi3rat
asp1ie
a1ha
aha1r
ahari1
1ahaw
ah1ra
a2hr
a1hu
a1ho
1ahos
ahol1
aho2g
aho1m
a1hi
a1he
ahe1p
ah2l3
ahy1
au1ra
au1ro
au1ri
au1re
au1ry
au2d3a1to
au1dat
au1dia
au1dic
au2ve
au1v
au2s2a.
au4sat
aus3a1tiv
aus1si3a
au1su
au1sey
aust3i1b
a1uu
au1na
aun1d
au1br2
au1bu
au1bo
aub1i
aub3e2r.
au1ber
aub3e2rs
au3bl2
3au1chee
au1cu
auc2e
au1cer
au2cy
au1i
au1e
au3ta
au1tr
au1th
au1ti
au4ti2cs
aut1en
au2la
aul3ine
aul1ie2
aul2t
ault1i
ault1e
au1ph
au1q
ao2r1d
ao1ri
a1ok
a1os
1aoh2
aon1
a1o1b
aoc1
ao1i
1aow
an1ar1c
a1nad2i
an1ah
an1a2ns
an1a3bl2
an1ace
an1a1cl
a1nai
